Vermont, session 2025-2026, S310.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2454a is amended to read:
§ 2454a. CONSUMER CONTRACTS; AUTOMATIC RENEWAL
(a) A contract between a consumer and a seller or a lessor with an initial
term of one year or longer that renews for a subsequent term that is longer than
one month shall not renew automatically unless:
(1) the contract states clearly and conspicuously the terms of the
automatic renewal provision in plain, unambiguous language in bold-face type;
VT LEG #385906 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.310
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) in addition to accepting the contract, the consumer takes an
affirmative action to opt in to the automatic renewal provision; and
(3) if the consumer opts in to the automatic renewal provision, the seller
or lessor provides a written or electronic notice to the consumer:
(A) not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days before the
earliest of:
(i) the automatic renewal date;
(ii) the termination date; or
(iii) the date by which the consumer must provide notice to cancel
the contract; and
(B) that includes:
(i) the date the contract will terminate and a clear statement that
the contract will renew automatically unless the consumer cancels the contract
on or before the termination date; and
(ii) the length and any additional terms of the renewal period.
(b) A seller or lessor under a contract subject to subsection (a) of this
section shall:
(1) provide to the consumer a toll-free telephone number, e-mail email
address, a postal address if the seller or lessor directly bills the consumer, or
another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for canceling the
contract; and
VT LEG #385906 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.310
2026 Page 3 of 3
(2) if the consumer accepted the contract online, permit the consumer to
terminate the contract exclusively online, which may include a termination e-
mail email formatted and provided by the seller or lessor that the consumer can
send without additional information.
(c) A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair and
deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(d) The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(1) a contract between a consumer and a financial institution, as defined
in 8 V.S.A. § 11101, or between a consumer and a credit union, as defined in
8 V.S.A. § 30101; or
(2) a contract for insurance, as defined in 8 V.S.A. § 3301a.
(e) A seller or a lessor, under any contract between a consumer and a seller
or a lessor with an initial term of one month or longer that renews indefinitely
without termination by the consumer, shall notify the consumer annually of the
right to terminate the contract. The notice required by this subsection shall
comply with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385906 v.1